New Mexico, session 2026, HB101.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the board of regents of New Mexico state university for the New Mexico department of agriculture for expenditure in fiscal year 2026 and subsequent fiscal years for the regional farm to food bank program. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund. SECTION 2. EMERGENCY.--It is necessary for the public peace, health and safety that this act take effect immediately. .233190.1